District of Columbia statutes.
22-1838

Forfeiture.

(a)

In imposing sentence on any individual or business convicted of a violation of this chapter, the court shall order, in addition to any sentence imposed, that the individual or business shall forfeit to the District of Columbia:

(1)

Any interest in any property, real or personal, that was used or intended to be used to commit or to facilitate the commission of the violation; and

(2)

Any property, real or personal, constituting or derived from any proceeds that the individual or business obtained, directly or indirectly, as a result of the violation.

(b)

The following shall be subject to forfeiture to the District of Columbia and no property right shall exist in them:

(1)

Any property, real or personal, used or intended to be used to commit or to facilitate the commission of any violation of this chapter.

(2)

Any property, real or personal, which constitutes or is derived from proceeds traceable to any violation of this chapter.

History

Oct. 23, 2010, D.C. Law 18-239, § 108, 57 DCR 5405